Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 6. Clinical Utilization Review Board

§ 2031.
Creation of Clinical Utilization Review Board.

No later than June 15, 2010, the Department of Vermont Health Access shall create a Clinical Utilization Review Board to examine existing medical services, emerging technologies, and relevant evidence-based clinical practice guidelines and make recommendations to the Department regarding coverage, unit limitations, place of service, and appropriate medical necessity of services in the State’s Medicaid programs.

The Board shall comprise 10 members with diverse medical experience, to be appointed by the Governor upon recommendation of the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access. The Board shall solicit additional input as needed from individuals with expertise in areas of relevance to the Board’s deliberations. The Medical Director of the Department of Vermont Health Access shall serve as the State’s liaison to the Board. Board member terms shall be staggered, but in no event longer than three years from the date of appointment. The Board shall meet at least quarterly, provided that the Board shall meet no less frequently than once per month for the first six months following its formation.

The Board shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

Identify and recommend to the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access opportunities to improve quality, efficiencies, and adherence to relevant evidence-based clinical practice guidelines in the Department’s medical programs by:

examining high-cost and high-use services identified through the programs’ current medical claims data;

reviewing existing utilization controls to identify areas in which improved utilization review might be indicated, including use of elective, nonemergency, out-of-state outpatient and hospital services;

reviewing medical literature on current best practices and areas in which services lack sufficient evidence to support their effectiveness;

conferring with commissioners, directors, and councils within the Agency of Human Services and the Department of Financial Regulation, as appropriate, to identify specific opportunities for exploration and to solicit recommendations;

identifying appropriate but underutilized services and recommending new services for addition to Medicaid coverage;

determining whether it would be clinically and fiscally appropriate for the Department of Vermont Health Access to contract with facilities that specialize in certain treatments and have been recognized by the medical community as having good clinical outcomes and low morbidity and mortality rates, such as transplant centers and pediatric oncology centers; and

considering the possible administrative burdens or benefits of potential recommendations on providers, including examining the feasibility of exempting from prior authorization requirements those health care professionals whose prior authorization requests are routinely granted.

Recommend to the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access the most appropriate mechanisms to implement the recommended evidence-based clinical practice guidelines. Such mechanisms may include prior authorization, prepayment, postservice claim review, and frequency limits. Recommendations shall be consistent with the Department’s existing utilization processes, including those related to transparency, timeliness, and reporting. Prior to submitting final recommendations to the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access, the Board shall ensure time for public comment is available during the Board’s meeting and identify other methods for soliciting public input.

The Commissioner may adopt a mechanism recommended pursuant to subdivision (c)(2) of this section with or without amendment, provided that if the Commissioner proposes to amend the mechanism recommended by the Board, he or she shall request the Board to consider the amendment before the mechanism is implemented or is filed as a proposed administrative rule pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 838

.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § C34; amended No. 156, § F.7;

2011, No. 78

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 2, 2012.

§ 2032.
Role of Department of Vermont Health Access.

The Department of Vermont Health Access shall provide the Clinical Utilization Review Board with data support to enable the Board to conduct reviews.

The Department’s Program Integrity Unit shall inform the Board of practices the Unit has identified through its reviews in order to avoid duplication of efforts.

The Department shall provide members of the Board with per diem compensation.

The Department shall have the final authority to evaluate and implement the Board’s recommendations.

The Department shall conduct comprehensive evaluations of the Board’s success in improving clinical and utilization results using claims data and a survey of health care professional satisfaction. The Department shall report annually by January 15 to the House Committee on Health Care and the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare regarding the results of the most recent evaluation or evaluations and a summary of the Board’s activities and recommendations since the last report. The provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

(expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the report to be made under this subsection.

The Department shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 as needed to implement specific recommendations.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § C34; amended

2013, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 70;

2015, No. 11

, § 36.